(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“ET.”
“...reality series that August.”
“Barbie Blank has confirmed her split from husband Sheldon Souray in an exclusive statement to Us Weekly.”
““Sheldon and I have decided that it’s best we take some time apart to work on ourselves at this time,” the reality star said.”
““We have the deepest love and respect for one another and would really appreciate everyone respecting our privacy during this difficult time.”
“Thank you!”As previously reported, Us Weekly exclusively revealed on Monday, October 9, that the couple had decided to part ways.”
““They separated a couple months ago,” one insidertold Us, noting that the pair also deleted many of their photostogether from their Instagram accounts.”
““Barbie is already going ondates with other guys.”Blank, 30, and Souray, 41, got engaged in August 2014 and tied the knot in Mexico in February 2016.”
“Their wedding day was documented on the E!”
““I just love being able to call him my husband,” the former WWE star, who used the ring name Kelly Kelly, gushed to The Knot at the time.”


"Wait a minute."
“… That August reality series. "
"Barbie blanch confirmed her breakup with her husband Sheldon Suri in an exclusive statement to us weekly."
"Sheldon and I have decided that now we'd better be apart for a while and exercise ourselves," the reality TV star said
"We have the deepest love and respect for each other. Thank you very much for respecting our privacy in this difficult time."
"Thank you! "As previously reported, US weekly exclusively revealed on Monday, October 9 that the couple decided to go their separate ways."
"They separated a few months ago," a person familiar with the matter told us, adding that they had removed many photos from their instagram account
"Barbie has dated other men." Blanc, 30, and Suri, 41, were engaged in August 2014 and married in Mexico in February 2016
"Their wedding day is recorded on the Internet!"
"I just like to be able to call him my husband," former WWE star Kelly Kelly, who used the ring's name, gushed the knot at the time



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My dad always taught me to lead by example, so I hope I can set a good example that you can have fun by helping other people and you can make a change just by doing that.””
““It’s something that’s bred into us, to really give back to the community,” Prince explained.”
“The 19-year-old daughter of late pop icon Michael Jackson shared a home movie featuring her younger self goofing around with older brother Prince in honor of his 21st birthday, on Tuesday.”
“The footage featured the siblings playfully fighting for camera time while someone filmed and encouraged them, “Let me see you dance.” Prince busted out a few dance moves before Paris got a close-up and made a funny face.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““My dearest brother.”
“...i could fly to the moon and back a thousand times and the distance still wouldn’t amount to how much i adore you,” Paris captioned the video post on Instagram.”
““I’ve always looked up to you, and to this day you’re still the greatest role model i could ever hope for.”
“...i miss these days where we could wrestle and i’d still have a chance at winning, though.”
“...i miss playing hot wheels and my little pony with you, i miss fighting like pirates and trying to cast spells with our harry potter wands.”


"My father always taught me to set an example, so I hope I can set a good example. You can have fun by helping others, and you can make a change by doing so."
"It's our nature to really give back to society," Prince explained
On Tuesday, the 19-year-old daughter of the late pop star Michael Jackson and her brother Prince watched a family movie to celebrate his 21st birthday
"In this video, the brothers and sisters play and fight for camera time, while someone filmed and encouraged them to say," let me see you dance. " Prince danced a few steps in front of the Parisian camera and made a funny face
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My dearest brother."
"I can fly to the moon and fly back thousands of times, but the distance is not enough for me to admire you," Paris wrote in an instagram video post
"I have always respected you, and to this day, you are still the greatest example I hope for."
“…… I miss the days when we could wrestle, but I still have a chance to win
“…… I miss playing Ferris wheel with you and my pony, fighting like pirates, casting spells with our Harry Potter wand. "



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Help is out there.”Edwards alleged that MTV doesn’t want to show him or Mackenzie “in a happy light or that I am active in my recovery.””
“RELATED VIDEO: Teen Mom’s Maci Bookout Granted 2 Year Order of Protection Against Ex Ryan Edwards: ReportEdwards’ latest arrest comes just days after he and his wife Mackenzie announced they would not be returning for the upcoming season of Teen Mom OG.”
“According to the Hamilton County Sheriff’s Office, Edwards, 30, was arrested on Monday by the Red Bank Police Department in Red Bank, Tennessee.”
“PEOPLE has reached out to Red Bank authorities for further information.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Edwards was charged with simple possession of heroin and is currently being held in the Hamilton County Jail without bond, according to the Hamilton County Sheriff’s Office.”
“He is scheduled to appear in Red Bank Court on Aug. 6.”
“The Ashley was the first to report the news.”
“MTV did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Image zoom Ryan Edwards | Credit: Hamilton County Sheriff’s OfficeShe was reportedly granted the two-year order in May.”


Edwards claimed that MTV didn't want him or McKenzie to "see the happy side, and didn't want me to be actively involved in rehabilitation."
"Related video: the young mother's MACI booking has been granted a two-year protection order against the former Ryan Edwards: Edwards was last arrested a few days after he and his wife Mackenzie announced that they would not return in the upcoming young mother og season," he said
According to the Hamilton County Sheriff's office, Edwards, 30, was arrested Monday by red bank police at red bank, Tennessee
"People have contacted the red bank authorities for further information."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to the Hamilton County Sheriff's office, Edwards, accused of possessing heroin alone, is currently being held in Hamilton County prison without bail
"He is scheduled to appear in the Red Bank Court on August 6."
"Ashley was the first to report the news."
"MTV did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
"Image zooming Ryan Edwards | credit: Hamilton County Sheriff's office, who was reported to have received a two-year order in May."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FYI: Jenna is wearing a Zuhair Murad Couture dress, Stella Luna shoes, and Jennifer Fisher jewelry.”
“And make some noise for Eve!”Also pictured inside: Jenna‘s stylist Brad Goreski hitting the red carpet.”
“He added, “I can’t say this name right.”The crew member then said, “Here is Jenna Dewan Tatum” and Khaled cut him off and said, “Thank you, thank you, thank you.”
“Hold on, where my girl at?” Khaled said before grabbing a crew member.”
“Where my girl at?”
“LIONS!”
““Our next presenters are lions.”
“The DJ co-hosted the show and had to introduce Jenna and Eve to the stage.”
“DJ Khaled can’t seem to figure out how to say Jenna Dewan Tatum‘s name, so he made someone else say it at the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards held at The Forum on Sunday (March 11) in Los Angeles.”


"For reference only: Jenna is wearing a zuhair Murad dress, Stella Luna shoes and Jennifer Fisher jewelry."
"Give Eve a voice! "It also shows Jenna's stylist Brad goresky walking on the red carpet."
He added: "I can't say the name well." The crew went on, "this is Jenna Dewan Tatum," and Khalid interrupted, saying, "thank you, thank you, thank you."
"Wait, where's my daughter? "Khalid said before catching a crew member."
"Where's my daughter?"
"Lion
"Our next host is the lion."
"DJ co hosted the show and had to introduce Jenna and Eve to the stage."
"DJ Khalid doesn't seem to know how to name Jenna Dewan Tatum, so he asked others to name her at the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards at the Los Angeles Forum on Sunday (March 11)



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The dad-to-be revealed that Iman’s due date is August 19 in an interview with The New York Times earlier this month.”
“Guests at the wedding included Chrissy Teigen and Gabrielle Union, while model Jourdan Dunn and Giants player Odell Beckham Jr. were members of the bridal party.”
““As I approach motherhood I want to wish a Happy Mother’s Day to all mothers and mommies to be.”Iman and Shepard tied the knot on March 3 at the Beverly Hills Hotel in Los Angeles in front of their family and friends.”
““Daddy and Mommy can’t wait to meet you,” she captioned a picture of Shepard cradling her baby bump.”
“I was super sick.”Iman revealed in a May Instagram post that she’s expecting her first child with the New York Giants wide receiver.”
““I really struggled.”
““The first trimester was very difficult,” the beauty told Us at the Fragrance Foundation Awards in New York City on June 12.”
“Earlier this month, Iman dished to Us Weekly about her rough first few months of pregnancy.”
““So ready for this little girl  thank you @cherishep3 @shelby_shep_ @ashleigh_shep for a beautiful baby shower,” she wrote.”
“...baby In the last photo she couldn t contain her excitement as she posed alongside a clothesline filled with pink onesies...”


"In an interview with the New York Times earlier this month, the father to be revealed that Iman's due date is August 19."
Guests at the wedding included Christie tegan and Gabriel Younian, while model Jordan Deng and giants player Odell Beckham Jr. were part of the wedding party.
On March 3, Iman and Shepard married in front of family and friends at Beverly Hills Hotel in Los Angeles
"Mom and dad can't wait to see you," she wrote in a photo of Shepard holding her little lump
"I'm very ill." Eman revealed on instagram in May that she is looking forward to her first child being with the New York Giants' all-round recipients
"I'm really struggling."
In June 12th, the beauty told us at the awards ceremony of the perfume foundation held in New York: "the first three months of pregnancy are very difficult."
Earlier this month, Iman told us every week about her difficult experiences in the first few months of pregnancy
"I'm ready to meet the little girl, thank you for giving me a beautiful baby shower," she wrote
“…… Baby, in the last picture, when she was standing by a clothesline full of pink tights, she couldn't help her excitement... "



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“View clips of her Good Morning Britain interview here.”
“That's about me,'" Harding said.”
“Tonya Harding threatened to walk out of an interview with Piers Morgan after the Good Morning Britain host implied that the former ice skater is using the film I Tonya to play the victim and questioned her involvement with in...”
“...the attack on her rival Nancy Kerrigan...”
“On the show to discuss the movie starring Margot Robbie, Harding grew visibly frustrated as Morgan began implying that the film victimized her, rather than Kerrigan, whom Morgan believed was the true victim.”
““Maybe it suits you to play the victim,” Morgan told Harding.”
““But I think the victim in all this wasn’t you.”
“It was Nancy Kerrigan, who had her Olympic dream shattered.”After taking a moment to respond, Harding then threatened to end the interview.”
““Thank you so much.”
“I appreciate being on your show, but I think I’m going to have to say, ‘Have a good night.'"”


"Watch the footage of her good morning UK interview here."
"It's about me," Harding said
"Good morning, the British host suggested that the former skater was playing the victim in the movie my Tonya and questioned her relationship with After being implicated, Tonya Harding threatened to withdraw from the interview with pierce Morgan. "
“… The attack on her rival Nancy krigan... "
"In the discussion of the film starring Margot Robbie, Harding was obviously frustrated because Morgan began to suggest that the film hurt her, not kriegen, who Morgan thought was the real victim."
"Maybe you're fit to play the victim," Morgan told Harding
"But I don't think you are the victim of all this."
"It's Nancy Kerrigan. Her Olympic dream is shattered." After answering for a while, Harding threatened to end the interview
"Thank you very much."
"I appreciate your show, but I think I have to say, 'good night.'



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH THE FULL INTERVIEW HERE:”
“Then I was like, ‘Oh fuck!”
“Following the outburst of the #MeToo and Time’s up movements earlier this year Bella shared her story of being molested until the age of 14, on social media – something she largely struggled to do.”
“Chatting to Under The Influence Bella clarified that she has never been put in an uncomfortable situation while working on set saying things never went beyond flirtatious and revealed that she had been thinking about telling her story for a...”
“...long time but instantly second guessed her decision after she did...”
““I've been thinking about saying it for a really long time.”
“I was just very sad.”
““I was so angry I just tweeted it out.”
“Do I delete it?’ And then I was like, ‘No, Bella.”
“...incident...”


"Watch the full interview here:
"And then I said," Oh, shit! "
"Earlier this year, after the outbreak of metoo and time's up, Bella shared her story of being harassed until she was 14 on social media, and that's what she's trying to do."
"When chatting with the affected people, Bella clarified that she had never encountered any discomfort while working on the set, said that things never went beyond the scope of flirtation, and revealed that she had been considering telling her story for a period of time..."
"For a long time, but after she made the decision, she immediately guessed..."
"I want to say that for a long time."
"I'm just sad."
"I was so angry that I posted it on Weibo."
"Do I want to delete it? And I said, "no, Bella."
“… Event



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Representatives for Spurlock and Warrior Poets have not yet responded to Vanity Fair’s request for comment.”
“Under information and belief due to Spurlock s Twitter confession and the resulting fall out from the admissions Warrior Poets is having serious internal problems and may not have the funds to compensate TEN for the breach of contract lawyer Neal Levin wrote in the suit according to The Guardian...”
“The Oscar-nominated documentarian’s social-media feeds went quiet and his projects were halted—most conspicuously, an unfortunately timed TNT docuseries titled Who Rules the World?, which was to examine the unique issues facing modern women.”
“Thanks to Spurlock’s admission of sexual harassment, it seemed best for him to back away, leaving this project to the network.”
“But Spurlock apparently didn’t make a clean enough break from the series.”
“According to Deadline, Turner Entertainment Networks is now suing Spurlock for botched communication with the network, as well as failing to give back funds that were earmarked for the show.”
“In the suit, which was filed on Tuesday in a federal court in Los Angeles, Turner’s lawyers argue that Spurlock’s contract was breached and that he failed to return funds, The Guardian notes.”
“The sum has not been disclosed.”
“Per Deadline, Turner requested financial data from the show once the company took over production, but did not get a response from Spurlock or his production company, Warrior Poets.”
“In addition, it requested Spurlock and his team return production funds, but again did not receive a response.”


"Representatives of sprock and the warrior poets have yet to respond to vanity fair's request for comment."
According to the guardian, lawyer Neal Levin wrote in the complaint: "based on information and belief, the warrior poet has serious internal problems and may not have enough funds to compensate 10 people for their breach of contract due to Spurlock's confession on Twitter and the resulting dismissal from the admission list."
The Oscar nominated documentary man's social media message disappeared, and his project was stopped at the most obvious time. This is a TNT documentary called "who rules the world"? "To study the unique problems faced by modern women."
"Thanks to sprock's admission of sexual harassment, he'd better step back and leave the project to the Internet."
"But sprock obviously didn't get enough breakthroughs from the series."
"According to the deadline, Turner entertainment network is currently suing sprock, accusing him of poor communication with the network and failing to return the program's special funds."
In a lawsuit filed in federal court in Los Angeles on Tuesday, Turner's lawyer argued that sprock's contract had been violated and that he had not returned the money, the guardian said
"The amount has not been disclosed."
"Every deadline, Turner would ask for financial data after the company took over production, but there was no response from sprock or his production company, warrior poems."
"In addition, it asked sprock and his team to return production funds, but again there was no response."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although it doesn't seem like they'll quit with giant displays of flowers any time soon, it's great to see that they know what's truly important — family time and pancakes.”
“Well, unless you count IHOP.”
“Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty ImagesThe INSIDER Summary:Kim Kardashian told Allure magazine that she and husband Kanye West did "absolutely nothing" for their anniversary.”
“She also said that they have a "no gifts" policy to keep themselves and their children grounded.”
“It's great that these two are finding a balance that works for them.”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West may be one of the most famous couples on the planet, but even they know that sometimes keeping things low-key is best.”
“Kardashian told Allure magazine that she and her husband have a strict "no gifts" policy in order to keep herself, West, and their children as grounded as possible.”
““We don’t do gifts," she told them.”
“"[Kanye and I] talk about it all the time, about not getting too much and trying to be as grounded and well rounded as possible.”
“I don’t like presents anymore."”


"It doesn't look like they're going to give up the hypermarket soon, but it's nice to see that they know what's really important - family time and pancakes."
"Well, unless you count me in."
"Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images inside summary: Kim Kardashian, who told allure magazine that she and her husband Kanye West" did nothing "on their anniversary
"She also said that they have a" no gift "policy to keep themselves and their children grounded."
"I'm glad the two have found the right balance for them."
"Kim Kardashian and Kanye West may be one of the most famous couples on the planet, but even they know that sometimes it's best to keep a low profile."
Kardashian told temptation magazine that she and her husband have a strict "no gift" policy to keep themselves, West and their children as secure as possible
"We don't give gifts," she told them
"(Kanye and I) have been talking about this issue, about not getting too much, trying to be down-to-earth and comprehensive."
"I don't like gifts anymore."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““That may not sound like a big deal to everybody, but when you’re a single momraising four kids with debt and you have nothing to your name, it’s s—tty.”Thorne currently stars in the teen drama Midnight Sun with Patrick Schwarzenegger.”
““We were living off Stouffer’s coupons, and that’s what we had to eat every day,” she shared.”
“...the Disney series...”
“Thorne recalled walking into the audition and thinking This pays the bills this is what you do During an appearance on the MTV podcast Happy Sad Confused in April 2017 Thorne opened up about how her family was about to physically live on the street if she didn t land...”
““I like darker things.”So it should come as no surprise that playing CeCe Jones for three seasons on the Disney Channel’s Shake it Up wasn’t Thorne’s dream job.”
““I love Rachel McAdams, but I’m not Rachel McAdams,” Thorne quipped.”
“...with juicy nuggets including how the star s agents wanted her to be the next Rachel McAdams...”
“Michael Heller CEO of digital marketing firm Talent Resources previously told Us Weekly that brands pay up to 500 000 for a campaign to Kim Kardashian while sisters Khloe and Kourtney can make up to 250 000 for sharing snaps Vogue s Inside the Life of Bella Thorne is filled...”
“Of course Thorne isn’t the only celeb sitting on an Instagram gold mine.”
““It’s all from social media.” (She dropped $2 million on a 4,500-square-foot L.A. home in 2016.)”


"It's not a big deal for everyone, but when you're a single mother with four debt ridden children and you're not worthy of your name, it's too bad." Thorne is currently in the teen drama midnight sun with Patrick Schwarzenegger
"We live on Stoff's coupons, and that's what we have to eat every day," she said
“… Disney series... "
"Thorne recalled that when she walked into the audition, she thought it was your performance on MTV podcast happy sad confused, and that's what you did in April 2017. Thorne disclosed how her family would live on the street if she didn't log in... "
"I like dark things." So it's no surprise that playing Seth Jones for three seasons in Disney Channel's "shake it up" is not a dream job for Thorne
"I love Rachel McAdams, but I'm not Rachel McAdams," Thorne quipped
“… Including star agents who want her to be the next juicy nugget of Rachel McAdams... "
"Michael Heller, CEO of digital marketing company talent resources, told us weekly earlier that the brand paid as much as $500000 for an event for Kim Kardashian, while the Khloe and Kourtney sisters could pay as much as $250000 for sharing fashion photos from Bella Thorne's life..."
"Of course, Thorne is not the only celebrity sitting on instagram gold mine."
"It's all from social media." (in 2016, she spent $2 million on a 4500 square foot house in Los Angeles.)



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'”Watch the video above to see Shelton read more tweets.”
“...a time of division and strife but at least People Magazine has united us in our certainty that Blake Shelton is not the Sexiest Man Alive...”
“Relief Later in the video the singer reads Blake Shelton looks like the dad in a drug commercial where they list off the side effects at the end while you watch him build a birdhouse Story continues below advertisement Shelton also reads his favourite tweet We may be living in...”
“Shelton goes on to read another tweet Blake Shelton is sexy if you like a guy who s always about to lean in and tell you about a hearty healthy American dog food READ MORE Blake Shelton Usher perform Stand By Me for Hand In Hand A Benefit For Hurricane...”
“Did a bunch of celebrities die or something last night?” Shelton laughs in response.”
“Another tweet read, “Woke up and saw Blake Shelton is the sexiest man alive.”
“You will be missed.” In response, The Voice coach smirks at the camera.”
“RIP every sexy man in the world who died in the ‘Great Sexy Plague of 2017’ overnight.”
“So I just wanted to read you some of my favourite mean posts.”READ MORE: Blake Shelton named Sexiest Man Alive 2017 by ‘People’ magazineOne of the tweets read, “Woke up this morning to the news that Blake Shelton is the Sexiest Man Alive.”
““And I wanted to look at social media and see what’s being said out there by my supportive people.”


Watch the video above to see Sheldon read more tweets. “
“… It's a time of division and struggle, but at least people has united us, and we are convinced that black Sheldon is not the sexiest man in the world... "
"Relief at the back of the video, singer reading black Sheldon looks like his father in a drug ad, they list the side effects at the end, and you see the story of him building a birdhouse continues the following ad. Sheldon also reads his favorite twitter, we may live in..."
"Sheldon went on to read another tweet:" black Sheldon is sexy. If you like a guy who always tells you about a healthy American dog food on his body, read more about black Sheldon Usher's performance. Stand by me hand in hand. The benefits of Hurricane... "
"Did a bunch of celebrities die last night? "Sheldon responded with a smile."
Another tweet said, "wake up and see black Sheldon is the sexiest man in the world."
"You'll be missed." In response, the voice coach smiles at the camera
"Tear up every sexy man in the world who died of" 2017 sexy plague "overnight."
"So I just want to read you some of my favorite caustic posts." Read more: Black Sheldon was named the sexiest man of 2017 by people magazine, and one of the microblogs said, "wake up this morning and find that black Sheldon is the sexiest man."
"I want to look at social media and see what those who support me are saying."



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Sandra Bullock and Boyfriend Bryan Randall Pack on the PDA -- See the Pic!”
“Hear more in the video below!”
“The foursome was first spotted together in September 2015, enjoying dinner at Bullock's restaurant, Bess Bistro, in Austin, Texas.”
“Although Aniston's husband, Justin Theroux, was seemingly absent from dinner on Saturday, these two couples are no strangers to double date nights.”
“Just last week, the two were spotted packing on the PDA after leaving the restaurant for lunch.”
“BackgridThe Italian eatery seems to be a favorite for Bullock and Randall.”
“Her beau complemented her look in a light gray button-down shirt and skinny jeans.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"This video is not available because we were unable to load the sponsor's email."
Sandra Bullock and her boyfriend Bryan Randall pack on a PDA - look at the pictures
"Hear more in the video below!"
"The four were first found together in September 2015 while they were having dinner at Bullock's restaurant, Bess Bistro in Austin, Texas."
"Although Aniston's husband, Justin Theroux, appeared to be absent from the dinner party on Saturday, the two couples are no strangers to a double date night."
"Just last week, someone found out that they left the restaurant for lunch and packed on the PDA."
"Italian restaurants seem to be Brock's and Randall's favorites."
"Her boyfriend is wearing a light gray button up shirt and tight jeans, which complement her appearance."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ICYMI, check out more details and wedding guest photos from Serena and Alexis‘ wedding!”
“Kanye and Jay reportedly did not join their wives for the star-studded event.”
“Kim showed off her figure in a long black dress, styling her hair into a low ponytail, while Beyonce wore a long-sleeve green gown with a plunging neckline, sporting a high ponytail.”
“Sources told the outlet that the two ordered champagne at the VIP bar together to celebrate the newlyweds.”
“News reports.”
“The 37-year-old Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and the 36-year-old “Formation” singer were spotted standing close together at the tennis player’s wedding to Alexis Ohanian at the Contemporary Arts Center on Thursday (November 16) in New Orleans, E!”
“Kim Kardashian and Beyonce came face-to-face with each other at mutual friend Serena Williams‘ wedding for the first time since their husbands Kanye West and Jay Z got involved in feud.”


"Icymi, see more details of Serena and Alexis's wedding and wedding guests photos!"
"It is reported that Kanye and Jay did not attend the Star Festival with their wife."
"Kim showed off in a long black dress with a low ponytail, while Beyonce wore a long green sleeve dress with a drooping neckline and a high ponytail."
"The source told the media that they were ordering champagne at the VIP bar to celebrate their wedding."
"News coverage."
The 37 year old Kardashian star and the 36 year old "formation" singer were found together at the tennis player's wedding to Alexis o'hanian at the center for contemporary art in New Orleans on Thursday (November 16)! "
"Kim Kardashian and Beyonce face each other at the wedding of their mutual friend Serena Williams. This is the first time since their husbands Kanye West and jay z got into a rift."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Just cause you’re drunk doesn’t mean you’re invisible!””
““I think people think they sit in the back of the bus and they somehow turn invisible,” record champ Johnny Devenanzio sums up.”
“Raines was still dating Giacone when he shot this season of The Challenge, but it seems the two may have broken up after rumors of his hookup with Nakagawa.”
“The reality star is also parent to 9-month-old Isla Rose with high school sweetheart Alyssa Giacone — his “skeleton” that came back to haunt him during his stay in the Real World house.”
“Walls-Channing found out she was pregnant with Raines’ child shortly after they broke up and gave birth to his first daughter, 16-month-old Harper.”
“...first season of The Challenge in 2015”
“You re the one with the mom and the kid at home and this is what you re gonna do on national television Raines has had his fair share of scandals on and off the show after also cheating on his Real World costar Madison Walls Channing while on his...”
“!” Cara Maria Sobello says in the clip.”
““What are you doing, Tony?”
“And his fellow competitors are calling him out.”


"Just because you're drunk doesn't mean you're invisible!"
Record champion Johnny devnanzio concluded: "I think people think they're in the back of the bus and somehow they're invisible."
"Raines is still dating jakone during the shooting of this season's challenge, but the two seem to have broken up after rumors of his collusion with Nakagawa came out."
"The reality TV star is also the parent of 9-month-old Isla Ross and high school sweetheart Eliza giarne - his skeleton comes back to haunt him when he's in a real-world house."
"Shortly after their breakup, Channing found out that he was pregnant with Raines' child and gave birth to his first daughter, 16 month old Harper."
“… The first quarter of 2015 challenge
"You're the one with a mother and a child in your family. That's what you're going to do on national television. Raines has a lot of scandals on and off the show, because he cheated his real-world partner Madison Walsh Channing..."
"!" Carla Maria sobello said in the clip. "
"What are you doing, Tony?"
"His competitors called him in."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Alexa, Nia and Carmella are girls I love, and I enjoy working with all of them.”
“You love your friends, but you also love seeing and meeting new girls.”
“My life in and out of the ring isn’t the five minutes you see me on SmackDown or Raw or WWE programming.”
“So, to be able to share with the world what it is that we do, what makes us laugh, what makes us cry, what drives us nuts, what gets on our nerves – being able to share that sisterhood with the girls is most important.”
“We’ve never done a reality show like this before.”
“And we’ve never, ever let cameras behind the scenes before like this.”
“It’s so cool that I’ve been able to allow the audience to be on that journey with me, that roller coaster of life.”
“- NatalyaNATALYA: I think it’s been, for me, a journey, to be on this show since day one.”
“To be able to showcase [my] journey from Season 1 and have it finally reach fruition on Season 7 has been a dream come true.”
“How does it feel to be one of the veterans of the show?”


"Alexa, nia and Carmella are the girls I love and I love working with them."
"You love your friends, but you also like to meet and meet new girls."
"My life inside and outside the ring is not the five minutes you see me in the ring, in the original or on WWE."
"So being able to share with the world what we do, what makes us laugh, what makes us cry, what makes us crazy, what makes us nervous - being able to share sisterhood with girls is the most important thing."
"We've never done a reality show like this before."
"We've never, never had cameras behind the scenes like this."
"It's so cool that I can let the audience go on the journey of life and ride the roller coaster of life with me."
"Natalia Natalia: I think it's a journey for me to be on this show from day one."
"It's a dream come true to be able to show (me) the journey of season one and finally realize it in season seven."
"How does it feel to be a veteran of the show?"



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““May wish #4 come true my beautiful baby boy,” she wrote on Instagram alongside a snap of her blond-haired boy surrounded by balloons and a birthday cake.”
“The singer and businesswoman celebrated her son’s birthday with a tribute on her Instagram, featuring a video of her two kids singing “The Happy Birthday Song” in their own style of Carpool Karaoke.”
“Image zoom Credit: Jessica Simpson InstagramImage zoom Credit: Jessica Simpson InstagramImage zoomImage zoom Credit: Jessica Simpson InstagramImage zoom Credit: Joe Simpson Instagram.”
“They wore beach-themed outfits with vibrant greens and floral designs.”
“The entrepreneur posed with her kids and husband Eric Johnson, 37, for a family photo alongside Moana and Maui.”
“Ace’s party featured a bounce house and games, including personalized toy sacks from My 1st Years.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Jessica Simpson‘s son celebrated his fourth birthday with a Moana-inspired party — complete with a Maui lookalike — in the family’s backyard, which was made to look like the Isle of Te Fiti, the island of the goddess featured in the Disney film.”
“Mom of two Jessica Simpson celebrated her son's fourth birthday with a Moana-inspired birthday partyHappy birthday, Ace Knute!”


"May 4 be a reality, my beautiful little boy," she wrote on instagram
The singer and businesswoman celebrated her son's birthday on instagram, playing a video of two children singing "happy birthday song" in their car sharing karaoke style
"Image scaling credit: Jessica Simpson instagram image scaling credit: Jessica Simpson instagram image scaling credit: Jessica Simpson instagram image scaling credit: Joe Simpson instagram."
"They're wearing beach themed clothes, green and floral patterns, full of energy."
The entrepreneur took pictures with her children and 37 year old husband Eric Johnson, and with Mona and Maui
"Ace's party has bounce house and games, including my first year's personalized toy bag."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Jessica Simpson's son held a Mona style party in his backyard to celebrate his fourth birthday. At the party, there was an image similar to Maui, which was like the goddess island of Disney movies, tefiti island."
"Jessica Simpson, mother of two, celebrated her son's fourth birthday with monana's birthday party. Happy birthday, ACE Knut!"



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The series was created by John de Mol, who serves as executive producer along with Mark Burnett, Audrey Morrissey, Chad Hines, Amanda Zucker, Kyra Thompson, and Stijn Bakkers.”
“The Top 8 artists will perform live in front of their coaches, which will also feature “Special Duet Blends.”“The Voice” is a presentation of MGM Television, Talpa Media USA Inc. and Warner Horizon Unscripted & Alternative Television.”
“...round...”
“Bringing these two voices together with Blake and Adam for season 15 is sure to make this one of our best seasons yet On May 14 Clarkson continues on her quest to win her first season as a coach alongside fellow coaches Keys Levine and Shelton during the semi finals...”
““They each have a unique understanding of what it’s like to be in the artists’ shoes.”
““We are so excited to welcome back Kelly and Jennifer, two dynamic forces who bring undeniable soul, passion and inspiration as coaches” said Paul Telegdy, president of alternative and reality group at NBC Entertainment.”
“Alicia Keys, who is currently a coach, will not return for Season 15.”
“The two will be competing against Maroon 5 lead singer Adam Levine and country music star Blake Shelton in Season 15.”
“Hudson has also served as a coach on the U.K. version of “The Voice” twice, winning her first season on the series.”
“Clarkson currently appears as a coach on the popular singing competition series, while Hudson previously served as a coach during Season 13.”


The series was created by John demore, who worked as executive producer with mark Burnett, Audrey Morrison, Chad Hayes, Amanda Zucker, Keira Thompson and Stephen barks
The top eight artists will perform live in front of their coaches, including "special duets.". "Sound" is a presentation by MGM, Talpa media USA Inc. and Warner horizon unwritten & alternative television
“… Round... "
"Combining these two voices with season 15 of Blake and Adam will definitely make it our best season, but Clarkson continued her pursuit on May 14, partnering with Keith Levin and Sheldon in the semi-final to win her first season as a coach..."
"Each of them has a unique understanding of the artist's situation."
"We are very happy to welcome back the energetic forces of Kelly and Jennifer, who bring undeniable soul, passion and inspiration as coaches," said Paul trogdy, President of NBC Entertainment's alternative and reality group
"Alicia case is currently a coach and will not be back in season 15
"The two will compete in season 15 against" chestnut 5 "lead singer Adam Levin and country music star Blake Sheldon."
"Hudson also coached the British version of the voice twice, winning her first season in the series
Clarkson currently coaches the Pop series, while Hudson previously coached in season 13



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Further damage could be caused by the clips putting strain on the thin hair causing bald spots.”
“The clip in hair extensions will not hold with thin hair as the weight of each weft is really heavy and they tend to slide out, especially if you want them for every day wear!”
“The tape wefts and thin and lightweight, leaving no damage.”
“The tape extensions are bonded to your natural hair with tape (bonded like sandwiches in between your own hair) and are 1.5” wide wefts applied row by row.”
“Discover the various types of hair extension methods and learn about the best type of hair extension for thin hair:Tape in hair extensions are a relatively newer technique and the BEST for women with thin or fine hair.”
“However there is a solution for thin hair.”
“There is a concern that by wearing hair extensions, you may damage your hair.”
“But what if you have thin hair?”
“Hair extensions are great for giving you instant length and volume to your natural hair.”
“Keep reading to see why tape in hair extensions will completely transform anyone with thin or fine hair and WHY this is the BEST method for thin hair!”


"Further damage may be due to the clip pulling the hair, leading to alopecia."
"Clip in hair extensions will not be able to hold with thin hair because the weight of each weft is really heavy and they tend to slide out, especially if you want them to wear every day!"
"The tape is thin and light, leaving no damage."
The tape is taped to your hair (sandwiched in the middle of your own) and taped to it with 1.5-inch weft threads
"Explore various types of hair extension methods, and understand the best hair extension type for thin hair: tape hair extension is a relatively new technology, which is most suitable for women with sparse or thin hair."
"However, there is a solution to the problem of sparse hair."
"There is a concern that wearing long hair extensions may damage the hair."
"But what if your hair is thin?"
"Hair lengthening is great to give you instant length and volume of natural hair."
"Read on to see why tape extension in hair will completely change anyone with thin or thin hair and why this is the best way for thin hair!"



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Judy Greer Joins Jim Carrey's 'Kidding' Comedy SeriesJim Carrey to Star in Showtime Comedy 'Kidding', His First TV Series Since 'In Living Color'Jim Carrey Plays an Obsessed Cop Accused of Assault in 'Dark Crimes' Clip (Exclusive)”
“I was on one side of the door with a gun and he was on the other side of the door with a gun and he looked at me and I looked at him and just for a split second there was a really conscious kind of connection over the...”
“And the comedy icon is opening up about why this project was the one to draw him back.”
“Carrey and his Kidding co-stars, Judy Greer and Catherine Keener, sat down with ET's Nischelle Turner at the Television Critics Association summer press tour, and he talked about working on the small screen once again after almost a quarter of a century.”
“"Projects find you when you're ready to express them.”
“That's what I find," Carrey shared.”
“"The ones that you're drawn to are the ones that, for some reason, you've just experienced something very similar or something in your past is lit up by this."”
“Carrey got his big break as a cast member on the Fox sketch comedy series In Living Color, on which he starred from 1990 to 1994.”
“Carrey left the series following the release of his massive hit films Ace Ventura: Pet Detective, The Mask and Dumb and Dumber, which all came out in his final year on the show.”
“But Carrey said there was one memory he had from the made-for-TV movie Mike Hammer: Murder Takes All, which he shot alongside veteran film and TV star Stacy Keach back in 1989, that really gave him a passion for acting that he's never forgotten.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Judy Greer joins Jim Carey's "joke" comedy series. Jim Carey will appear in the entertainment comedy "joke", his first TV series since the reality show. Jim Carey plays an obsessed policeman accused of beating in the clip of "dark crime" (exclusive)
"I stand on one side of the door with a gun, he stands on the other side of the door with a gun, he looks at me, I look at him, in that moment, there is a kind of real conscious connection, over..."
"Comedy idol is making public why this project will attract him back."
"Kerry and his partners Judy Greer and Katherine kina sat down with ET's nischer Turner on the TV Review Association's summer reporter tour, and he talked about working on a small screen again nearly a quarter of a century later."
"When you are ready to express them, the project will find you."
"That's what I found," Kerry shared
"The people you're attracted to are the people who, for some reason, you've just experienced something very similar, or something in your past has been ignited by it."
Kerry made a great breakthrough as an actor in the fox comedy series the color of life from 1990 to 1994
"Kerry left the series after the release of his blockbusters Ace Ventura: Pet Detective, mask and dumb and dumb, all in his last year."
"But Kerry said he has a memory of the movie" Mike Hammer "made for television: in 1989, he filmed the movie" murder takes all "with veteran film star Stacy Keach Hammer:Mike Takes  It really gave him a passion that he never forgot. "



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s like a vicious cycle.””
“Before, I would be able to forget about it, because I would say, ‘Everything is so great [between us].’ But now it’s not so great.”
“In a sneak peek at Monday’s Real Housewives of Orange County, Shannon, 53, sits down for a heart-to-heart with her mother, admitting that her 40-lb.”
“...weight gain has created a wedge between her and her husband David.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““With all the weight gain — I don’t know how it happened,” she says in the clip first shared by E!”
“News.”
“After her mom asks if she’s gone to see a doctor about it, Shannon reveals she’s too afraid of what they might say.”
““Everyone says if it’s your hormones, then the weight will [come] off so easily,” she says.”
““And I’m afraid it’s not my hormones, I guess.”“I feel so s—ty about myself,” she continues, getting emotional.”


"It's like a vicious circle."
"Before, I could forget about it, because I would say," everything between us is wonderful. " But now it's not so good. "
Shannon, 53, peeked at Monday's "Real Housewives" in Orange County, where she sat down to talk to her mother, admitting her 40 pound weight
“…… The weight gain created a gap between her and her husband, David
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Weight gain, I don't know what's going on," she said at e! "
"News."
"After her mother asked her if she was going to see a doctor, Shannon said she was too afraid of what they would say."
"Everyone says it's easy to lose weight if it's your hormones," she said
"I don't think it's my hormones." "I feel very nervous about myself," she continued, emotional



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—With files from the Associated PressAdvertisement...”
“What a load of HORSESH**,” she tweeted.”
“The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority says McGowan surrendered to Airports Authority Police on Tuesday.”
“She’s charged with possession of a controlled substance.”
““Ms.”
“McGowan appeared in Loudoun County, Virginia, on Nov.14, 2017, to accept service of the Airports Authority Police arrest warrant, and she was released on a $5,000 unsecured bond,” a spokesperson for the police department said.”
“READ MORE: Rose McGowan alleges Harvey Weinstein offered $1M in hush moneyThe felony charge stems from what prosecutors say was cocaine found among McGowan’s personal belongings left behind on a Jan. 20 flight to Washington Dulles International Airport in Virginia.”
“An airport employee allegedly found McGowan’s wallet with two bags of white powder inside.”
“Story continues below advertisementFollowing her release, the actress spoke to the New Yorker’s Ronan Farrow.”
“McGowan explained to Farrow that she carried a slim card wallet with her on the trip to Washington and had not taken the wallet out of her bag, which was allegedly left unattended when she went to the washroom mid-flight.”


"- contains files from associated pressadvertisement..."
"It's a lot of bullshit," she tweeted
"The Washington Metropolitan Airport Authority said McGovern surrendered himself to the airport authority police on Tuesday."
"She was charged with possession of controlled substances."
"Ma'am. “
"On November 14, 2017, McGovern appeared in Lawton County, Virginia, where she was served with an airport authority police arrest warrant and released on $5000 in unsecured bonds," a police spokesman said
"Read more: Rose McGovern has charged Harvey Weinstein with a $1 million felony for sealing money after prosecutors said McGovern found cocaine in personal belongings left behind on a flight to Dulles International Airport in Washington, Virginia on January 20."
"An airport employee said to have found McGovern's wallet with two bags of white powder in it."
"The story continues under the advertisement. After her release, the actress was interviewed by Ronan Farrow of the new Yorker
"McGowan explained to Farrow that she had a thin card wallet with her when she was traveling to Washington and didn't take it out of the bag. It was said that her wallet was unattended when she went to the bathroom on the way."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Will you be watching “Marriage Boot Camp?””
“Yeah, I didn’t know anything about that.”
“WE TV’s “Marriage Boot Camp” is set to premiere on September 7.”
“US Weekly caught up with the “Jersey Shore Family Vacation” star at the premiere party.”
“It was revealed earlier this year that Danity Kane singer Aubrey O’Day was involved in an affair with Donald Trump Jr. while he was married to his soon-to-be ex-wife, Vanessa.”
“Vanessa allegedly found emails between Aubrey and her husband where he promised he would be leaving his marriage for her.”
“This happened in 2012 after the two met on the set of “Celebrity Apprentice” but only recently made headlines which is why Pauly was asked if it contributed to their split.”
““We didn’t address that at all.”
“I guess [the news broke] after or something like that,” he explained.”
“AdvertisementDo you think DTJ was serious about being with the singer?”


"Would you watch" marriage camp? ""
"Yes, I know nothing about it."
"Our TV station's marriage camp will premiere on September 7."
American weekly caught up with the Jersey coast family holiday star at the premiere party
"Earlier this year, it was revealed that the singer of danty Kane, Aubrey O'Day, and Donald Trump Jr. had an extramarital affair with Vanessa, who was about to become his ex-wife, when they got married."
"Vanessa is said to have found an email between Aubrey and her husband, promising to leave the marriage for her."
"It happened in 2012, when the two met on the set of Celebrity Apprentice, but it just made the headlines recently, which is why Paulie was asked if it contributed to their breakup."
"We didn't solve the problem at all."
"I guess it came after that or something like that," he explained
"Do you think DTJ is serious?"



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She will serve as maid of honor in her sister Willow Palin's upcoming wedding to Ricky Bailey.”
“Palin is the eldest daughter of former Alaska governor Sarah Palin.”
“Meyer cited "discord or conflict of personalities" as the reason for the split.”
“#1 A post shared by Bristol Meyer (@bsmp2) on May 8, 2018 at 12:59pm PDTPalin and Meyer celebrated Easter as a family in April following news Meyer filed for divorce in January after less than two years of marriage.”
“"#1," she captioned the picture.”
“She shared a photo Tuesday with her three children while celebrating Atlee's first birthday.”
“Palin is parent to Tripp with Levi Johnston and to Sailor and Atlee with her estranged husband, Dakota Meyer.”
“"I am so thankful for God's plan over our life, and His grace that has covered us entirely.. my kids truly are my biggest blessing #purpose," the star added.”
“"It took hearing your heartbeat for a positive pregnancy test to really mean anything to me.. and took holding you in my arms to realize my life was going to be changed forever," she said.”
“I was 17 and a junior in high school," Palin recalled of learning she was pregnant with Tripp.”


"She will be the bridesmaid at her sister's wedding to rich Bailey."
"Palin is the eldest daughter of former Alaska Governor Sarah Palin."
Meyer takes "discord or conflict of character" as the reason for breaking up
"In a post shared by Bristol Meyer (@ bsmp2) at 12:59 noon on May 8, 2018, pdtpalin and Meyer celebrated Easter as a family in April after Meyer filed for divorce in January this year less than two years after marriage."
"1," she wrote under the title of the picture
"She took a picture with her three children on Tuesday to celebrate attley's first birthday."
"Palin is the parent of Tripp and Livy Johnston, and of sailor and atley and her separated husband, Dakota Meyer."
"I'm very grateful that God's plans in our lives and his grace have completely covered us.. "My children are really my greatest blessing target," the star added
"It's really meaningful for me to hear your heart beat and have a positive pregnancy test.".. "Holding you in my arms makes me realize that my life will change forever," she said
"I was 17 years old, in the third grade of high school," Palin recalled learning that she was pregnant with Tripp



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and then in between takes we, you know, we're gettre...”
“...and in between the take, you know, you go into zero g for about 35 seconds.”
“>> with annabelle wallis.”
“>> jimmy: yes, who's fantastic as well.”
“>> yeah, she's amazing.”
“>> jimmy: but you really did your own stunts?”
“>> yeah, i had this idea.”
“...it was something i was actually talking to chris mckrory, who wrote it also, you know, were working on "mission" together and other films, and alex kurtzman, who worked -- he directed it.”
“...and so i had this idea for a a scene with annabelle wallis and i, that i wanted to do the plane crash for real.”
“...so, we went to bordeaux, france and we built this set inside this airplane.”


“… And then between the shots, we, you know, we got... "
“… Between these two shots, you know, you go into zero gravity for about 35 seconds. "
"> > with Annabel Wallis."
"> > Jimmy: Yes, he's great, too."
"> > yeah, she's great."
"> > Jimmy: but did you really do your own stunt
"> > Yes, I have the idea."
“…… This is what I talked about with Chris McCrory, who wrote, you know, he's also working on mission and other films, and Alex kurzman, who works - he directed the film. "
"So I had an idea. I wanted to make a scene with Annabel Wallis and me. I really wanted to film the plane crash."
“…… So, we went to Bordeaux, France, and we built this device in this plane



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Creator Rob Thomas has also released a pair of mystery novels that continue the adventures of the character.”
“In 2014, they raised $5.7 million on Kickstarter and made a film.”
“The show’s cast and creators have repeatedly voiced their desire to revive the show.”
“The cult hit, which originally aired on UPN and the CW between 2004 and 2007 before it was canceled, followed Veronica Mars, a high school student who moonlights as a private investigator.”
“...says that it will stream the show s existing three seasons and movie starting next summer and the show will return sometime in 2019”
“The new season will follow Veronica as she s hired to investigate the murders of spring breakers in a mystery that pits the enclave s wealthy elites against a working class that relies on the cash influx that comes with being the West Coast s answer to Daytona Beach Hulu...”
“Following Bell’s video, Hulu confirmed that it has picked up a limited, eight-episode season, with creator Rob Thomas coming back to write the first episode and produce the series.”
“Series star Kristen Bell announced on Twitter that the series is coming to Hulu for fans to rewatch, “which is great, because you’ll need to brush up, because we’re making another one!”In August, word broke that Hulu was working on a revival of the show.”
“Rejoice, Marshmallows: Veronica Mars is coming back for a new season.”


"The creator Rob Thomas also published a pair of mystery novels that continue the adventures of the characters."
"In 2014, they raised $5.7 million through KickStarter and made a movie."
"The cast and creators of the play have repeatedly expressed their hope of reviving the play."
"The cult hit was first broadcast on UPN and CW between 2004 and 2007, and was later cancelled, followed by Veronica Mars, a high school student who worked part-time as a private detective."
“…… It said that it will start broadcasting its three existing seasons and films from next summer, and the show will return sometime in 2019
"The new season will be staged after Veronica is hired to investigate the murder of the spring destroyer. It's a mystery that confronts the rich elite in enclaves with the working class who depend on cash inflow, which is the West Coast's response to Hulu in Daytona Beach..."
"After Bell's video, Hulu confirmed that it has started a limited, eight episode season, with creator Rob Thomas coming back to write the first episode and produce the series."
"Series Star Christine bell announced on twitter that the series will come to Hulu for fans to watch again," which is great, because you need to review, because we are making another series! "In August, there was news that Hulu was working on the revival of the show."
"Happy, marshmallow: Veronica Mars is back for another season."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Solange Announces Hurricane Harvey Benefit ShowsWill Smith Introduced Jada Pinkett To The ‘Grapefruit’ TechniqueJamie Foxx To Head Star-Studded Telethon For Hurricane Harvey Relief was originally published on hellobeautiful.comAlso On Praise 104.7:”
“Reese Witherspoon and Blake Shelton will reportedly host from Nashville on Sept. 12, while the Los Angeles portion will be hosted by Jamie Foxx and tentatively Hilary Duff, who was born in Houston.”
“Currently, Kevin Hart, Sandra Bullock, the Kardashians, Leonardo DiCaprio, Dwayne Johnson and Jamie Foxx are just a few of the celebrities who have donated to various Hurricane Harvey relief efforts.”
“Now, Jamie Foxx is set to head a star-studded telethon to raise even more money to aid Houston citizens to rebuild their lives.”
“As reported by Entertainment Tonight, Texas native Jamie Foxx recently announced that he will host a telethon to raise money for Houston’s Hurricane Harvey relief and many of his celebrity friends will join in to help as well.”
“Scheduled for September 12, the telethon will feature celebrities hosting from different cities, including Los Angeles, Nashville and New York.”
“Via Entertainment Tonight:The Sept. 12 telethon will be aired by all the major networks for one hour.”
“The star-studded event is reportedly being organized by rapper Bun B and the same team behind the widely praised Ariana Grande One Love Manchester concert.”
“Duff Instagrammed about Hurricane Harvey on Monday, writing, “This is beyond devastating.”
“We’ll give you more details, so we can raise as much money as we can for everybody down there.”You can check out the FULL video of Jamie Foxx BELOW:Check out today’s Top Stories here:Hometown Hero!”


Sorange announced that will smith introduced Jada pinkert's use of grapefruit technology, and Jamie fox was the head of the star TV show "hurricane Harvey rescue." hellobeautiful.com And section 104.7:
Reese Witherspoon and Blake Shelton will host the show in Nashville on September 12, while Jamie Fox and Houston born Hillary Duff will host the Los Angeles segment, according to reports
"At the moment, Kevin Hart, Sandra Bullock, the kardashians, Leonardo DiCaprio, Dwayne Johnson and Jamie fox are just a small number of celebrities who have contributed to various hurricane Harvey rescue efforts."
"Now, Jamie fox will lead a star studded TV marathon to raise more money to help the people of Houston rebuild their lives."
According to entertainment tonight, Texas native Jamie fox recently announced that he will host a TV marathon to raise money for hurricane Harvey rescue in Houston, and many of his celebrity friends will join in to help
The TV marathon scheduled for September 12 will be hosted by celebrities from different cities, including Los Angeles, Nashville and New York
"Through Entertainment Tonight: September. The 12 TV marathon will be broadcast by major TV networks for one hour. "
"The star studded event was reportedly co organized by rapper bunb and the acclaimed behind the scenes team of Ariana Grande One love Manchester."
Duff blogged on Monday about hurricane Harvey, writing: "it's devastating."
"We'll give you more details so we can raise as much money as possible for everyone below." You can see Jamie Fox's full video below: check out today's headlines here: Home hero



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The two rappers haven’t been spotted together at all in recent years, although Jay said earlier this year that Kanye is still “like a brother” to him.”
“Since then, Jay has addressed Kanye on songs like “Kill Jay Z,” “LOVEHAPPY,” and “FRIENDS.” Kanye also split with TIDAL over withheld royalty payments last year.”
“However, we currently don’t know who is involved with the album or how long it might be.”
“Kanye’s other 2018 releases all ran exactly seven songs, a trend he could be continuing with his latest release.”
“As such, it’s unclear if anything on Yandhi will be drawn from the long-fabled Yeezus 2 music.”
“However, in the five years since Yeezus dropped, it seems likely that Kanye has released or repurposed at least some of that material.”
“He further elaborated on the possibility in a Genius annotation:Last November, Genius discovered that CyHi The Prynce’s personal Spotify account contained a playlist of Yeezus 2 songs, further confirming that it existed at some point.”
“Rick Rubin first told NewsWeek in 2013 that Yeezus 2 “might be” seeing a release date at some point after he insisted on splitting what was originally a 16-track album into two parts.”
“Talk of a Yeezus sequel is hardly new.”
“The artwork is a purple MiniDisc, an audio media format that experienced its greatest popularity in the mid-1990s.”


"The two rappers have not been found together at all in recent years, but earlier this year, Jay Chou said Kanye was still" like a brother "to him
Since then, Jay has addressed Kanye in songs like kill jay z, love happy and friends. Last year, Kanye also broke up with tidal for defaulting on royalties
"However, we don't know who is involved in this album at present, and we don't know how long this album may last."
"Kanye only released seven songs in other releases in 2018, and this trend may continue to his latest release."
"It's not clear, therefore, whether anything on youngdi will be drawn from the long-standing legend of yezus 2 music."
"However, in the five years since the fall of yezus, it seems that Kanye has released or reused at least some of these materials."
He further elaborated on the possible explanation in Genius: in November last year, genius discovered that cyhi the PRYNCE had a play list of yeezus 2 songs in his personal spotify account, which further confirmed its existence at a certain time. "
Rick Rubin told Newsweek for the first time in 2013 that yeezus 2 "may see the release date at some point because he insists on dividing the original 16 track album into two parts."
"It's nothing new to talk about the sequel to yezus."
This is a purple Mini CD, an audio media format that was most popular in the mid-1990s



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have no doubt about that.””
“I know that Puerto Rico will bounce back.”
“Luis Fonsi, Ricky Martin, Nicky Jam and Chayanne traveled to the US territory on Monday, October 2, on board a Jet Blue flight as part of a special program set up by the Despacito singer that will transport goods to the victims living on the island.”
“Luis took to Instagram to share a photo of himself on the jetliner, which was named "100x35 JetBlue" after the island’s measurements.”
“Attached to a group picture of himself with his fellow musicians, the 39-year-old wrote, "United more than ever by Puerto Rico.”
“There we go ... #UnidosPorPuertoRico ❤️@ricky_martin @chayanne @nickyjampr."”
“CLICK FOR FULL GALLERYVIEW GALLERY Luis partnered with Jet Blue for special flights that will deliver goods to and from Puerto Rico in the upcoming weeks Photo: Instagram/@luisfonsiRicky, Nicky Jam and Chayanne shared the same image on their respective Instagram accounts.”
“Also on board the flight were basketball stars Ray Allen and Carlos Arroyo, in addition to TV personality Rashel Diaz and former Yankees star Jorge Posada.”
“Cuban music legends Gloria and Emilo Estefan also took the flight and shared a special video with fans while en route.”
“MORE: Jennifer Lopez, Marc Anthony and Pitbull form all-star alliance to aid Puerto Rico“Hello my beautiful people from Puerto Rico,” Gloria said.”


"I have no doubt about that."
"I know Puerto Rico will rebound."
"Louis fonsey, Ritchie Martin, Nicky jam and chayani flew to the territory of the United States on Monday, October 2, in a jet as part of a special program set up by desperate singer to deliver goods to victims on the island."
"Louis shared a photo of himself on instagram of the jet, which was named '100x35 JetBlue' according to the size of the island."
"Puerto Rico is more united than ever," the 39 year old wrote in a group photo of himself and other musicians
"Well... #Puerperal University ❤️ @Rich Martin @ chayani @ Nick Jamp. “”
"Click to see all galleryview Gallery Luis works with Jet Blue to provide photos of special flights to and from Puerto Rico over the next few weeks: instagram / @ luisfonsircy, Nicky jam and chayanne share the same images on their respective instagram accounts."
"There are basketball stars Ray Allen and Carlos Arroyo on board, TV stars Raschel Diaz and former Yankee star Jorge Posada
"Cuban music legends Gloria and emilo Estefan also took the flight and shared a special video with fans on the way."
More: Jennifer Lopez, Mark Anthony and Peterborough form an All Star Alliance to help Puerto Rico "Hello, my beautiful Puerto Rican people," Gloria said



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I parent to let Matilda feel free to be herself, and I am finally loved by someone who makes me feel free.””
““I work to be free inside of the moment.”
““Ultimately the way he loves me is the way I want to live my life on the whole,” Williams told Vanity Fair.”
“He has a daughter, Agathe, 3, whose mother, artist Geneviève Castrée passed away from pancreatic cancer in 2015, just over a year after giving birth.”
“Like Williams, Elverum is also a single parent who lost his partner to tragedy.”
“They had a daughter together, Matilda, who’s now 12.”
“He added that while he did not attend the couple’s wedding in July, he was planning on visiting them in Brooklyn “soon.”Williams and Ledger dated from 2005 to 2007, separating shortly before Ledger’s death.”
““She’s very private and I don’t really like to make too many comments about her, but we are very happy [for her],” Kim Ledger told the paper.”
“And in an interview with Australia’s Sydney Morning Herald this weekend, Heath Ledger’s father, Kim, said he and his family are “terribly happy” for Williams.”
“Photo: Jeffrey Mayer/WireImageLast week, Michelle Williams revealed in a profile for Vanity Fair’s September issue that she recently married musician Phil Elverum, of Mount Eerie, in a secret ceremony in the Adirondacks.”


"I wanted Matilda to be free, and I was finally loved by someone who made me feel free."
"I work to be free in the moment."
"At the end of the day, the way he loves me is the way I want to live," Williams told Vanity Fair
"He has a daughter, three-year-old AGAT, whose mother, artist ginaviev castray, died of pancreatic cancer in 2015, just over a year after giving birth."
"Like Williams, elvirum is a single parent family who lost his partner in the tragedy."
"They have a daughter, Mathilda, who is now 12 years old."
He added that although he did not attend the couple's wedding in July, he planned to visit them in Brooklyn "soon.". Williams and ledger were married from 2005 to 2007 and separated shortly before Ledger's death
"She's very private and I really don't like to comment too much on her, but we're very happy (for her)," Kim ledger told the paper
His father Kim told the Sydney Morning Herald this weekend that he and his family were "very happy" for Williams
"Photo source: Jeffrey Mayer / WireImage last week, Michelle Williams revealed in a profile in the September issue of vanity fair that she recently married strange Mountain musician Phil Elverum at a secret wedding in Adirondack."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...will choose the Oscars for their big reveal...”
“Now with reports claiming Brad s divorce to Angelina is on the verge of being finalised insiders tell New Idea it is all systems go for Brad 54 and Jen 49 to move forward with insiders tipping the former couple...”
“‘[Brad and Jen] have connected and are in fact in touch,’ a source close to Brad told Gossip Cop, describing the initial reaching out as ‘friendly communications’.”
“...camp are officially confirming reports of a reconciliation with Jen...”
“Having stayed in touch on and off over the years since their shock split in 2005 the couple have taken their friendship to a new level following the actor s break up with Angelina Jolie in 2016 and Brad s...”


“… They're going to choose the Oscars for their big unveiling... "
"Now it is reported that the divorce case between Brad and Angelina is about to be finalized. People familiar with the matter told new point that all systems of Brad 54 and Zhan 49 are in progress. People familiar with the matter tip the ex couple..."
A source close to Brad told gossip police, "Brad and Jan have established contact and, in fact, remain in contact." He described the initial contact as "friendly communication"
“… The camp has officially confirmed the reconciliation with Jane... "
"Since their shock breakup in 2005, the couple have been in intermittent contact. After actress Angelina Jolie broke up in 2016, their friendship has risen to a new level, Brad s..."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Love Simon I Wanna Dance With Somebody dream sequence Riverdale Cast performs A Night We ll Never Forget The Greatest Showman Phillip and Anne sing Rewrite the Stars This Is Us Kate sings Landslide...”
“Hip Hop Real Housewives RuPaul s Drag Race Vanderpump Rules BEST MUSICAL MOMENT powered by truth Stranger Things Mike and Eleven dance to Every Breath You Take WINNER Black ish Cast performs Freedom Call Me by Your Name Elio crying through the end credits Girls Trip Girls Trip dance battle...”
“Marvel’s Wakandan superhero adventure was by far the biggest winner of the year, taking home four golden popcorn trophies overall.”
“Black Panther himself Chadwick Boseman collected two prizes — though he gave away the prize for “Best Hero” to James Shaw, the man who wrestled a gun away from a gunman during the Waffle House shooting earlier this year.”
““Stranger Things” won three awards, including for “Best Show” and for performances by Millie Bobby Brown and Noah Schnapp.”
“Also Read: Millie Bobby Brown Splits Kneecap, Pulls Out of MTV Awards (Video)Other winners included “Keeping Up With the Kardashians,” “Love, Simon,” “IT,” “Wonder Woman” and the evening’s host Tiffany Haddish, for her breakout performance in “Girls Trip.” See the complete list of winners below.”
“BEST MOVIE Presented by Toyota Avengers Infinity War Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures Black Panther Walt Disney Studios Motion Pictures WINNER Girls Trip Universal Pictures IT New Line Cinema Wonder Woman Warner Bros Pictures BEST SHOW 13 Reasons Why Netflix Game of Thrones HBO grown ish Freeform Riverdale The CW”
“Stranger Things Netflix WINNER BEST PERFORMANCE IN A MOVIE Chadwick Boseman Black Panther WINNER Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name Ansel Elgort Baby Driver Daisy Ridley Star Wars The Last Jedi Saoirse Ronan Lady Bird BEST PERFORMANCE IN A SHOW Millie Bobby Brown Stranger Things WINNER Darren Criss The...”
“Assassination of Gianni Versace American Crime Story Katherine Langford 13 Reasons Why Issa Rae Insecure Maisie Williams Game of Thrones BEST HERO Chadwick Boseman T Challa Black Panther Black Panther WINNER Emilia Clarke Daenerys Targaryen Game of Thrones Gal Gadot Diana Prince Wonder Woman Wonder Woman Grant Gustin Barry Allen...”
“The Flash The Flash Daisy Ridley Rey Star Wars The Last Jedi BEST VILLAIN Josh Brolin Thanos Avengers Infinity War Adam Driver Kylo Ren Star Wars The Last Jedi Michael B Jordan N Jadaka Erik Killmonger Black Panther WINNER Aubrey Plaza Lenny Busker Legion Bill Skarsgard Pennywise IT BEST KISS”


"Love Simon, I want to dance with someone, dream series, Riverdale actors, one of the greatest performers we will never forget, Philip and Annie sing rewriting stars, this is our Kate singing landslide..."
"Hip hop real housewife rupaul s drag race vanderpump rules best music moment driven by truth strange things Mike and eleven dance to your every breath winner black actor perform free call me your name Elio cry through the end of credits girl travel girl travel dance fight..."
"Marvel's wackandan superhero adventure is the biggest winner so far this year, with a total of four gold popcorn trophies."
The Panther himself, Chadwick boseman, won two awards - although he awarded the "best hero" to James Shaw, who snatched a gun from the shooter in the waffle biscuit house shooting earlier this year
"Strange things" won three awards, including "the best show" and the performances of Millie Bob Brown and Noah schnap
"Read another: Millie Bobbie Brown splits her knee and quits the MTV Awards (video). Other winners include" keep up with Kardashian "," love, Simon "," it "," Wonder Woman "and host Tiffany hadish of the night, who made a breakthrough in" girl's journey ". See the full list of winners below. "
"Best movie award by Toyota Avenger endless war Walt Disney film studio movie Panther Walt Disney film studio movie award winner girl travel universal it new line Movie Wizard Warner Bros. best show 13 reasons why Netflix game of Thrones HBO has grown into a free-form Riverdale CW"
"Strange things Netflix won the best film performance award Chadwick boseman Panther winner Timothy é e chalamet called me your name Ansel Elgort baby driver Daisy Ridley star wars last Jedi saoirse Ronan Lady Bird best show Millie Bob Brown strange things winner Darren Cris the..."
"Gianni Versace assassinated Katherine Langford 13 reasons why Issa ray is not safe" game of Thrones "best hero Chadwick Bosman t. Chala Panther Panther award winner Amelia Clarke danielis taglian" game of Thrones "Prince gado Diana prodigy grant Gustin Barry Allen …”
"Twinkle, twinkle, twinkle, twinkle, Daisy Ridley ray, star wars, the last Jedi villain, Josh Brolin SANOS, the avenger, the endless war, Adam's rider, kilo Ren, star wars, the last Jedi, Michael B. Jordan n. jadaka Eric, killer dealer, Panther award winner, Aubrey square, Lenny Basque legion, bill scarsgarde pennivis, best kiss ”



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and NBC are both part of the NBC Universal family.”
“He eventually called home to tell his mom he was sorry but waited to call his father.”
“In the episode, Jack's last moments are spent trying to spend time with his family.”
“Jack wanted to enjoy the 1998 Super Bowl with his family and their new entertainment system that he built, but all the kids had different ideas.”
“Kate, played by Hannah Zeile, was struggling with her self image as she had to submit another audition piece to get into college, and didn't want Jack to film her or to keep telling her how beautiful he thought she was.”
“Going Behind the Scenes of This Is Us With the Adorable CastKate skipped the game with her father to go watch at a friend's house.”
“Randal, played by Niles Fitch, wanted to skip to take his girlfriend on their first date when they shared their first kiss, and Randall got the chance to tell his dad that when he got home.”
“Kevin, played by Logan Shroyer, fought both of his over college and ended up spending the evening with his then-girlfriend Sophie.”
“Before going to bed, Jack dried some things with a dish towel, gazed at the wall where the kids' heights were recorded, and turned off the "wonky" crockpot, received from a neighbor.”
“E!”


“… And NBC are part of the NBC global family. "
"He finally called home and said he was sorry, but he was waiting to call his father."
"In this episode, Jack's last moments are with his family."
"Jack wants to enjoy the Super Bowl in 1998 with his family and the new entertainment system he built, but all the kids have different ideas."
"Kate, played by Hannah zeylar, is struggling with her self-image because she has to submit another audition to enter the University. She doesn't want Jack to take pictures of her, and she doesn't want to keep telling her how beautiful he thinks she is."
"It's a behind the scenes story of us and the lovely caster. Kate and her father jumped the game and went to a friend's house to watch it."
"Randall, played by Nils Fitch, wants to skip this step on his first date with his girlfriend. When they share their first kiss, Randall has a chance to tell his father when he gets home."
"Kevin, played by Logan schloyer, quarrels with his parents for college and ends up spending the night with his then girlfriend Sophie."
Before going to bed, Jack wipes something dry with a towel, stares at the place where the children's height is recorded on the wall, and turns off the "wobbly" pottery from the neighbor
“E！”



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Abby Lee Miller Says She's 'On the Mend' After Second Surgery...”
“Former "Dancing With the Stars" pro Cheryl Burke briefly replaced her for the second half of the series' seventh season.”
“Watch Abby Lee Miller's Tearful Exit in Sneak Peek From Her Final 'Dance Moms' AppearanceMiller revealed last March via Instagram that she was leaving the show, which she starred on as head coach since its debut in July 2011.”
“According to a post on dancemomscasting.com, the dance instructor is looking for fresh new talent ages 7-12 to train and compete in her Abby Lee Dance Company and star on the show.”
“EXCLUSIVE: 'Dance Moms' Stars on 'Traumatizing' Experience With Abby Lee Miller & Watching Her Enter PrisonAnd it appears Miller is already leading casting development.”
“Following a few arduous years, the 51-year-old reality star will be making her comeback on the Lifetime series' upcoming eighth season, a source tells ET.”
“Abby Lee Miler is returning to "Dance Moms!"”


"Abby Lee Miller said she was" recovering "after the second operation
Former "dancing with stars" professional Cheryl Burke briefly took her place in the second half of the series's seventh season
"From Abby Lee Miller's last appearance as a" dancer "and her tearful exit from peeping, Miller revealed through instagram in March last year that she would leave the TV series that has been the head coach since its premiere in July 2011."
"According to an article about dancemomscasting.com The dance coach is looking for a 7-12-year-old newcomer to train and compete in her Abby Lee dance company and play on the show
"Exclusive: 'dancing mom' star with Abby Lee Miller's' trauma 'experience and watching her enter prison, it seems Miller has led the casting development."
A source told et: "after several hard years, the 51 year old reality star will be back in the upcoming eighth season of life series."
Abby Lee Miller is back on dance mom



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While we wait to hear Fredrik and Derek's big news, get ready for an all-new MDLNY on Thursday at 9/8c, below.”
“But it's gonna all make sense soon."”
“I'll share it when the time is ready," the #MLDNY agent said.”
“Fredrik Eklund shared a major update in the most recent episode of Million Dollar Listing New York.”
“The real estate broker revealed that he and his husband, Derek Kaplan, were going to try again to have a baby with a new egg donor, new surrogate, and a new doctor.”
“However, that's all that Fredrik is sharing about his journey with Derek to start a family these days.”
“"This is one of the reasons that I'm so happy.”
“We chose, I chose, not to talk about it.”
“Sorry, boring answer.”
“But I think that I shared so much for so long, maybe too much, which is important," Fredrik told The Daily Dish during a recent interview.”


"As we wait for the big news from Frederick and Derek, we're ready for next Thursday's new mdlny at 9 / 8 degrees Celsius."
"But it will make sense soon."
"When the time comes, I'll share it with you," mildeni's agent said
"Frederick Eklund shared a major update in a recent episode of the million dollar New York stock market."
"The real estate agent revealed that he and her husband Derek Kaplan intend to try again to have children with new egg donors, new surrogate mothers and new doctors."
"But that's Frederick's recent experience with Derek."
"That's one of the reasons I'm happy."
"We chose, I chose, not to talk about it."
"Sorry, boring answer."
"But I think it's important that I've been sharing it for so long, maybe too much," Frederick told the daily menu in a recent interview



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Like, really moved on.”
“The This Is Us star is currently dating Kelly Egarian—a 31-year-old marketing coordinator—and although it's hard to imagine Ventimiglia, 40, with anybody else other than his current TV wife Rebecca (Mandy Moore), that's exactly the goal for the star.”
“"I try to minimize myself so people can see the character and can really dive into the work,” Ventimiglia told People back in December.”
“Naturally, this makes us wonder *even more* how Ventimiglia spends his time off screen.”
“Here, everything you need to know about Kelly Egarian and the pair's low-key relationship.”
“They made their first public appearance together at the 2017 Emmys.”
“Though they didn't walk the red carpet together, Egarian joined Ventimiglia at their seats during the award show where Ventimiglia's co-star, Sterling K. Brown, received an Emmy for outstanding lead actor for drama series.”
“The couple were also spotted kissing and dancing at the Emmys after party.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"It's like, really moving on."
"This is an American star who is currently dating Kelly egarian, a 31 year old marketing coordinator, although it's hard to imagine Ventimiglia, 40, with anyone except his current TV wife, Rebecca (mandimore), which is exactly the star's goal."
"I try to reduce my workload so that people can see the role and really get involved in the work," Ventimiglia told people in December
"Of course, it makes us want to know more about how Ventimiglia spent time off screen."
"Here, you need to know everything about Kelly igarian and their low-key relationship."
"They made their first public appearance at the 2017 Emmy Awards."
"Although they didn't walk the red carpet together, egarian and Ventimiglia sat together at the awards ceremony, and Ventimiglia's partner, Stirling K. brown, won the Emmy Award for best actor."
"After the party, the couple were still kissing and dancing at the Emmy Awards ceremony."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since their split, the two have remained friendly and cordial, and are often seen on outings with their young toddler.”
“'The pair have been spending a lot of time with each other in recent months, both in the gym and out at various restaurants to enjoy some fine dining, and it seems this budding romance began as a friendship.'”
“And on Wednesday, Hilary Duff was playfully jealous as boyfriend Jason Walsh cuddled up to her dog - and not her.”
“The threesome looked to be in bed, with Justin face down and asleep.”
“'Well this isn't fair': On Wednesday, Hilary Duff was playfully jealous as trainer boyfriend Jason Walsh cuddled up to her dog - and not herOn Snapchat, Hilary, 29, appeared to be in full make-up as she lamented over her situation.”
“'Well this isn't fair,' the mum-of-one pointed out, as she lied down next to her pooch, Peach.”
“The Younger star and her trainer were rumoured to be dating in March of this year, with a source shooting down the claims to E!”
“News.”
“Summer lovin The couple were first confirmed to be dating in June Mornings Hilary was spotted in West Hollywood on Thursday Girls time The actress hit up Ed s Coffee in West Hollywood with a pal But then in June the couple were spotted out together with a source confirming...”
“...their romance to E”


"Since their breakup, they have been friendly and cordial. They often see them traveling with their young children."
"In recent months, they have spent a lot of time together, whether in the gym or in different restaurants, to enjoy food, and this budding relationship seems to start with friendship."
"On Wednesday, Hillary Duff jokingly envied her boyfriend Jason Walsh for holding her dog - not her."
"The three seemed to be lying in bed, and Justin fell asleep face down."
"It's not fair: on Wednesday, when coach boyfriend Jason Walsh was holding her dog, Hillary Duff was jokingly jealous - not Helon snapchat, 29, who seemed to wear makeup while bemoaning her situation."
"Well, it's not fair," one mother pointed out as she lay down next to her dog peach
"It's rumored that the young star and her coach will date in March this year, and a source refuted the E!"
"News."
The couple's first confirmed date was on the morning of June, when Hillary was found in West Hollywood on Thursday, when the actress and a friend drank Ed's coffee in West Hollywood, but later in June, the couple were found together, the source confirmed
“… Their romance



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All photos from KENZO website.”
“Spears’ is a timeless, American icon, and her reign as the queen of pop will surely last generations to come.”
“The collaboration certainly is a match made in heaven.”
“For the main ad campaign shot, Britney Spears wears the Cropped ‘Bamboo Tiger’ Sweatshirt, the Denim ‘Bamboo Tiger’ Denim Baseball Cap (already sold out), The Mini Denim ‘Kanagawa Wave’ Rucksack and the Denim Shorts.”
“The collection elevates the ever-popular “athleisure” trend.”
“...on denim moment on the Grammy s red carpet with then beau Justin Timberlake...”
“I love the brand and with denim being a big part of this collection it made it that much more appealing to me since denim is such a part of my own style Who could ever forget her matching denim...”
““I was really flattered when KENZO approached me to the face of their 50th anniversary line,” began Spears.”
“One of those motifs, for which KENZO had become internationally recognized, is “the jumping tiger,” developed by Kenzo Takada in the 1970s.”
“With a heavy focus on denim and the quintessential KENZO motifs, the collection is vast and wide ranging for both men, women and some pieces that may be worn by both genders.”


"All photos from Kenzo website."
"Britney is an eternal American Idol, and her rule as the queen of pop music will continue to the next generation."
"Cooperation is, of course, a match made in heaven."
"Britney Spears wore a cropped" bamboo tiger "sweatshirt, a denim" bamboo tiger "cowboy baseball cap (sold out), a mini denim" Kanagawa wave "backpack and denim shorts in the main advertising shots."
This series promotes the trend of "sports leisure" which has always been popular
“…… The cowboy moment with her then boyfriend Justin Timberlake on the Grammy red carpet... "
"I like this brand. Cowboy is an important part of this series, which makes it more attractive to me, because cowboy is a part of my own style, who will forget her matching with cowboy..."
"I was really flattered when Kenzo walked up to their 50th anniversary lines," spears began
One of the themes is "jumping tiger", which was developed by Kenzo takada in the 1970s and has been recognized internationally
"Focusing on denim and typical Kenzo patterns, the collection is widely used for men, women and some clothes that can be worn by both men and women."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can watch the Kardashian-Jenner family's full acceptance speech below.”
“Roy Rochlin/Getty ImagesThis isn't even the first — or second or third — time that Jenner has been turned into a meme while wearing sunglasses.”
“Fans on Twitter were quick to screenshot her look onstage and call her a "mood."”
“Even Kendall Jenner and Khloe Kardashian both seemed to poke fun at their mom onstage.”
“Later, they posted photos of her on Instagram.”
“Kris Jenner wore massive black sunglasses during the People's Choice Awards on Sunday — a stylistic decision many people were quick to dub a "whole mood."”
“Despite lurking behind her daughters onstage, Jenner's look commanded attention when the "Keeping Up With the Kardashians" stars accepted the award for Reality TV Show of 2018.”
“Even Khloe Kardashian appeared to poke fun at her mom onstage.”
“The family dedicated their award to California firefighters and first responders.”
“E!”


"You can watch the complete acceptance speech of the Kardashian Jenners below."
"Roy rochelin / Getty Images this is not even a meme of Jenner's first, second or third sunglasses."
"Twitter fans quickly took a screenshot of her face on stage and called her" mood. "
"Even Kendall Jenner and Khloe Kardashian seem to be making fun of their mother on stage."
"Later, they posted her picture on instagram."
At the people's Choice Awards ceremony on Sunday, Chris Jenner wore a pair of big black sunglasses - a stylistic decision that many quickly referred to as "the whole mood."
"Even though Jenna was hiding behind her daughter on stage, her expression caught people's attention when the stars of" keep up with Kardashian "won the 2018 reality show award."
"Even Kardashian was making fun of her mother on stage."
"The family dedicated their awards to firefighters and emergency workers in California."
“E！”



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And just last week, he took another walk through the city with Aubrey Plaza; amid romance rumors, a source told the outlet that the pals had only met up "to discuss a potential film project."”
“Saving lives!”
“It might sound far-fetched, but, according to a recent Instagram post, the trio are already "Bffffffs" and, no doubt, are looking for a way to take their friendship to the next level.”
“On Monday, Theroux posted the photo of the three to his Instagram Story.”
“Though it has since disappeared, the instantly iconic pic was screen-shotted and reposted by several quick-thinking Emma Stone fan pages.”
“In the shot, the three stars strike matching poses, chins resting on hands, and exhibit a variety of facial expressions: Van Ness serves deer-in-headlights realness, while Stone breaks into a serene smile, and Theroux offers up a mysterious smolder.”
“"Save lives!”
“Save lives!”
“Doing the most!"”
“On Sunday, he was spotted walking through New York City with Paul Rudd and Rudd's wife, Julie Yaeger.”


Just last week, he and Aubrey square took another walk in the city; in romantic rumors, a source told the media that they only met "to discuss a potential film project."
"Help
"It may sound far fetched, but according to a recent instagram post, the three are already" bfffffs. "There is no doubt that they are looking for a way to take their friendship to a new level."
"On Monday, Theroux posted photos of the three on instagram."
"Even though it's gone, this iconic image of the moment has been captured on the screen and reproduced on several quick thinking Emma stone fan pages."
"In the camera, the three stars put on a matching posture, chin on the hand, showing a variety of facial expressions: fannis in the headlights to serve the deer, while stone shows a calm smile, and Cyrus shows a mysterious smoldering."
"Help
"Help
"Do the most!"
"On Sunday, he was found walking in New York City with Paul Rudd and his wife, Julie Yeager."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Edwards was previously shown driving impaired during the season 6 finale of Teen Mom OG, while on the way to his wedding with Mackenzie Standifer Edwards, who was seen at times taking the steering wheel from him while on the road.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Bentley s baseball game in May 2017 under the influence of heroin and got in my face yelling and threatening to hurt me RadarOnline reported at the time...”
“News at the time that Edwards had left voicemail messages threatening to show up at my house and take my son and alleged he has made threats to show up and hurt me if I don t answer my phone The MTV star also alleged that Edwards had appeared at...”
“Image zoom Maci Bookout, Ryan Edwards | Credit: John Phillips/Getty; MTVBookout also claimed in court documents obtained by E!”
“She shares Bentley with Edwards, while her youngest two she shares with husband Taylor McKinney.”
“McKinney also filed an order of protection against Edwards.”
“The mother of three initially filed for an order of protection in March and listed her three children, Jayde, Maverick and Bentley in the protection order.”
“...for Edwards and Bookout did not immediately respond to PEOPLE s request for comment...”


"Edwards was previously photographed with a driving obstacle in the finale of" teenage mom og "Season 6 when he was on the way to his wedding with Mackenzie standifer Edwards and was seen snatching the steering wheel from him on the way."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"Bentley was influenced by heroin at the baseball game in May 2017, yelling in my face and threatening to hurt me..."
"At that time, it was said that Edwards left a voice mail, threatened to show up at my house and take my son, and claimed that he threatened to show up and hurt me if I didn't answer the phone. The MTV star also claimed that Edwards appeared in..."
Image zoom MACI bookout, Ryan Edwards | credit: John Phillips / Getty; mtvbookout also claimed to have obtained e! "In court
"She shared Bentley with Edwards and her two youngest cars with her husband, Tyler McKinney."
"McKinney also made a protective order against Edwards."
"The mother of three initially applied for a protection order in March this year and listed her three children, Jayde, Maverick and Bentley, in the order."
“… Edwards and Booker did not immediately respond to requests for comment... "



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A version of this article was originally published in May 2016.”
“Before Season 14 premieres at 9/8c on June 10, catch up on what every Food Network Star winner has done since nabbing that coveted title.”
“So, to make things easier, we did the work for you.”
“We’re here to tell you there’s no shame in looking up every single winner from past seasons, either.”
“...they ve been up to since filming wrapped...”
“When all is said and done and a winner is crowned if you re anything like us you likely reach for your phone the second the finale ends typing what s season winner name doing now or season winner name Instagram in the Google search bar to figure out what...”
“Go watch a bloopers reel of Giada De Laurentiis and Bobby Flay; we’ll wait.”
“Don’t believe us?”
“And Food Network Star has it all — plus two hosts with some real chemistry.”
“When done right, it’s the perfect blend of high-stakes competition, seriously tough challenges, delicious-looking food and, of course, a dash of drama.”


"A version of this article was originally published in May 2016."
"Before the premiere of Season 14 at 9 / 8 on June 10, please pay attention to the performance of every winner of gourmet.com after winning the championship."
"So, for your convenience, we did the work for you."
"We're here to tell you that looking back at every champion in the past few seasons, there's no shame
“… They've been busy since the shooting started... "
"When everything is said and done, a winner is coronation. If you are like us, you may reach the end of the second ending of your mobile phone. At the end of the second ending, type in the name of the season winner to do now or the name of the season winner. Instagram in the Google search bar, find out what..."
"Go to the movies of Jada de laurentiz and Bob fry. We'll see them."
"Don't believe us?"
"The food network stars have it all - plus two hosts who really have chemistry."
"If done well, it will be a perfect combination of high-risk competition, severe challenges, delicious food and, of course, a little drama."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prior to that, North’s parents went all out for their daughter’s first birthday, replicating a “Kid-chella” in their backyard complete with a ferris wheel.”
“You bring so much light to our lives and I am blessed beyond words to have you as my granddaughter.”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West’s adorable little girl turned 4 on Thursday, June 15, and her famous mom and family took to social media to shower her with love.”
““Happy birthday to my mini me!”
“I can’t believe you are 4 already,” the Selfish author wrote on her app.”
““I love you so much, Northie!”Kim, 36, also shared a video montage dedicated to her firstborn and released a set of Kimojis in her honor.”
“North’s Kimojis feature her cute cry face and, of course, the time she licked a window with a lollipop in hand.”
“See them in the video above!”
““Happy birthday to our beautiful, funny, smart little love bug, North.”
“It brings me so much joy to watch you grow up to be sweet and kind and loving,” matriarch and grandma Kris Jenner shared on Instagram, along with a collage of photo’s featuring Nori.”


"Prior to that, North's parents went all out for their daughter's first birthday, copying a child's chela in their backyard, equipped with a Ferris wheel."
"You have brought so much light to our lives. I feel very lucky to have you as my granddaughter."
"On Thursday, June 15, Kim Kardashian and Kanye West are four years old. Her famous mother and family pour their love into her on social media."
"Happy Birthday to my Minis!"
"I can't believe you're four years old," the selfish author wrote on her app
"I love you so much, nosy! "Kim, 36, also shared a video montage dedicated to her eldest son and released a kimojis for her."
"Kimojis in the North features her lovely crying face and, of course, when she licks the window with a lollipop."
"See them in the video above!"
"Happy birthday, our beautiful, interesting, smart little bug, north."
"I'm very happy to see you grow up sweet, kind and loving," matriarch and grandma Kris Jenner shared on instagram There is also a puzzle with nori as the protagonist



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Webb was transported to the Clark County Detention Center.”Image zoom Credit: Las Vegas Metropolitan Police DepartmentJust before the show, Spears had tweeted a warm message to her Vegas audience.”
“Webb was asked to leave the concert by security prior to him jumping on stage and dancing,” the statement read.”
“...fan rushed the stage...”
“The incident occurred Wednesday night just as the 35-year-old pop star finished performing “(You Drive Me) Crazy” towards the end of her set at the AXIS auditorium inside Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino.”
“In a video obtained by TMZ, Spears engaged the crowd, initially unaware that a man had climbed onto the stage, attempting to get her attention.”
“Quick-thinking dancers encircled the crasher until security agents arrived onstage and surrounded the headliner.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: X17Online/YouTube“Is something OK?” Spears asked.”
““What’s going on?”
“What’s wrong?” Then — visibly frightened — she gasped, “He’s got a gun?” Her mic was switched off as she was rushed to safety offstage.”


"Webb was taken to Clark County Detention Center." Photo credit: just before the show started, spears tweeted a warm message to her Las Vegas audience
"Webb was asked by security to leave the concert before he stepped on the stage to dance," the statement said
“…… Fan Chong came to the stage... "
"It happened on Wednesday night when the 35 year old pop star was performing" you're driving me crazy "in the axis auditorium at Hollywood planet Resort and casinos."
"In a video obtained by TMZ, spears attracted the audience. At first, she didn't know that someone had climbed onto the stage to try to attract her attention."
"Quick thinking dancers surrounded the Crashers until security officers came on stage and surrounded the headlines."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“Image zoom  Credit:X17Online/YouTube ”Is that ok? "Asked spears
"What's the matter?"
"What's the matter? And then - obviously scared - she gasped and said, "does he have a gun? "When she was rushed backstage, her microphone was turned off."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Every day I feel like she’s with me… she’s always in my heart.””
“Despite the fact that they were never able to mend their relationship in person, Chiquis still feels an incredible closeness to her mom.”
“Prior to her mother’s passing, the two women weren’t on speaking terms due to a nasty rumor that tore them apart.”
“Later that day Rivera’s eldest daughter Chiquis posted a sweet birthday message to ‘the most important woman in my life.’Chiquis has been open about the struggles she shared with her mother in the past.”
“Fortunately a mariachi band was there to help keep spirits high.”
“It was an emotional scene as family members cut the ribbon at the new store.”
“The store is focused on “executing Jenni’s dream by providing fun, sporty, high-quality clothing and accessories for the voluptuous, bold, beautiful woman.”Fans turned out to show their love and support for the late diva de la banda.”
“To commemorate the special occasion, Rivera’s family celebrated at the grand opening of the Jenni Rivera Boutique in Huntington Park, California on Sunday, July 2.”
“The void of her absence is felt by many, especially now as yesterday would have been Rivera’s 48th birthday.”
“It’s hard to believe that it’s been almost five years since the talented Jenni Rivera was tragically killed in a plane crash in Mexico.”


"Every day I feel like she's with me She's always in my heart. "
"Although they have never been able to repair their relationship in person, chiquez still feels an incredible closeness to her mother."
"Before her mother died, the two women were at loggerheads over a nasty rumor."
"Later that day, Rivera's eldest daughter, chiquez, sent a sweet birthday message to the most important woman in my life. Chiquez has always been honest about the struggles she and her mother have gone through in the past
"Fortunately, there's a mariachi band there to help people stay in high spirits."
"The family cut the ribbon in the new store, and the scene was very exciting."
The store is committed to "realizing Jennie's dream by providing sexy, bold and beautiful women with interesting, athletic and high-quality clothing and accessories." Fans have expressed their love and support for the late queen
To mark this special occasion, Rivera's family held a grand opening ceremony of the Jennie Rivera boutique on Sunday, July 2, in Huntington Park, California
"Her absence makes a lot of people feel empty, especially now, because yesterday was Rivera's 48th birthday."
"It's hard to believe that Genie Gianni Rivera has been killed in a plane crash in Mexico for almost five years."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As time has gone on, I’ve realized we were both unhappy.”Their relationship was chronicled on the now-defunct “Real Housewives of Miami.” She has kept an active career since the Bravo series tanked, working as a model and sharing barely-there snaps on social media.”
“The 38-year-old model and Zago jointly filed for divorce on July 10, 2017 after four years of marriage and a lengthy relationship.”
“A rep for the former “Real Housewives of Miami” star confirmed to E!”
“News Krupa is now engaged to Douglas Nunes.”
“Krupa showed off her engagement ring on social media on Sunday.”
““Just another weekend in the Krupa-Nunes household,” she wrote alongside the pic.”
“Nunes works as a president and partner at 451 Media Group, E!”
“...reported.”
“Krupa had remained quiet about the relationship in the past.”
““I feel alive again,” she told In Touch after the split.”


"Over time, I realized that we were all unhappy." Their relationship was documented in the now defunct Miami Real Housewives magazine. Since the Bravo series failed, she has maintained an active career as a model, sharing few snapshots on social media
"The 38 year old model and Zago filed for divorce on July 10, 2017 after four years of marriage and a long relationship."
The spokesperson for the former Miami Real housewife star confirmed that
"News Krupp is now engaged to Douglas Nunez."
"Krupa showed her engagement ring on social media on Sunday."
"Another weekend, at Krupa Nunes' house," she wrote next to the photo
"Nunes is the president and partner of 451 media group, e!"
“… It has been reported. "
"Krupa has been silent about this relationship in the past."
"I feel alive again," she said on the phone after the breakup



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s helping to promote A Star is Born – her new film with Brad Cooper that premiers next month.”
“Lady Gaga’s battle with chronic pain is only a small part of her interview with Vogue.”
“That fear and the drop in your stomach?”
“My diaphragm seizes up.”
“Then I have a hard time breathing, and my whole body goes into a spasm.”
“And I begin to cry.”
“That’s what it feels like for trauma victims every day, and it’s… miserable.”
“I always say that trauma has a brain.”
“And it works its way into everything that you do.”The 32-year old singer said it took years for her to open up about the sexual assault.”
““No one else knew.”


"She's helping to promote the birth of a star - her new film with Brad Cooper will premiere next month."
"Lady Gaga's struggle with chronic pain is just a small part of her interview with vogue."
"Fear and the dripping water in your stomach?"
"My diaphragm is stuck."
"Then I had difficulty breathing and I had cramps."
"I started to cry."
"That's how trauma victims feel every day, and It's tragic. "
"I always say trauma has a brain."
"Everything you do has its impact." The 32 year old singer said it took her several years to open up to sexual abuse
"No one knows."



**Something goes wrong**
“She also recently became the new face of luxury lingerie brand Fredrick’s of Hollywood.”
“Now enjoying a quieter life, the Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles star is focusing on her relationship with husband Beverly Hills 90210 actor Brian Austin Green and being a mom to their three kids Noah, Bodhi, and Journey.”
“Once I realized I [had] brought it on myself, it was an invaluable learning experience, looking back on it.”CosmopolitanMORE: Megan Fox Shares Rare Snap of Her Adorable Kids With Brian Austin Green -- See the Cute Pic!”
““However, that darkness that descended caused enormous and brisk spiritual growth.”
“I really thought I was Joan of Arc.”“It hurt me and a lot of other people,” she explained.”
“I was so self-righteous at 23, I couldn’t see [that] it was for the greater good.”
“All I had to was apologize, and I refused.”
““But without ‘that thing’, I wouldn’t have learned as quickly as I did.”
““That was absolutely the low point of my career,” Fox told Cosmo.”
“...herself as a martyr...”


"She has recently become a new face for Frederick, a Hollywood luxury lingerie brand."
"Today, the teenage Ninja Turtle mutant star enjoys a peaceful life, focusing on her relationship with her husband Brian Austin Green, an actor of Beverly Hills 90210, and becoming the mother of their three children Noah, Bodhi and journey."
"When I realized that I had brought it, looking back, it was a very valuable learning experience." Cosmopo litanMORE:Megan Fox Share a rare snapshot of her lovely children with Brian Austin Green - look at this lovely picture
"However, the coming darkness has brought great and active spiritual growth."
"I really thought I was Joan of arc." "It hurt me and a lot of other people," she explained
"When I was 23, I was so smug that I didn't see it was for the greater good."
"All I had to do was apologize, and I refused."
"But without that thing, I would not have learned so fast."
"It was definitely the bottom of my career," fox told cosmos
"As a martyr"



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was done to me,” Laurer told thedailybeast.com in 2011.”
““That tape happened to me.”
““Friends say Levesque wanted children; Laurer did not,” King reported.”
“THE BREAKING POINTThe Bleacher Report feature reveals Chyna and Triple H’s relationship began to deteriorate around 2000.”
“...to plot their way to the top of the wrestling world...”
“A bit of a loner growing up who found solace in the gym Chyna found a family in the WWE ranks and a boyfriend in Triple H The pair were inseparable on the road bonding over their dedication to a healthy lifestyle a love of lifting weights and a determination...”
““She was an anomaly and untouchable.”Offstage her life was flourishing too.”
““Shattered glass ceilings, kicked down doors, broke gender barriers,” fellow female star Trish Status tweeted after Chyna’s death.”
“After initial reluctance, male counterparts became willing to let her overpower them and in January, 1999, she became the first woman to ever take part in the Royal Rumble.”
“Chyna’s star power and undoubted talent allowed her to go where no female wrestler had been before.”


"It's done to me," laurel said of daily orient 2011
"That tape happened to me."
"Friends say levisk wants children, but laurel doesn't," King reported
"The breakthrough point of the Bleater report feature reveals that the relationship between Chyna and triple h began to deteriorate around 2000."
“… Plan how they can reach the top of the Wrestling World... "
"A lonely grower finds solace in the gym, and Chyna finds a family in WWE and a boyfriend in triple H. They are inseparable on the road. They are committed to a healthy lifestyle, love weightlifting, and are determined to... "
"She's an abnormal person. You can't touch her." Her life is also very prosperous
"Break the glass ceiling, kick the door, break the gender barrier," a colleague of actress Tracy tweeted after Zina's death
"After the initial reluctance, male colleagues began to be willing to let her overwhelm them. In January 1999, she became the first woman to participate in the Royal Rumble."
"Zina's star power and undoubted talent have brought her to a place that female wrestlers have never been to."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m still in contact with Sarah Paulson!” Medley offered.”
“Cohen revealed that they’d connected Medley with multiple celebrity admirers.”
““I literally thought, I’m already so low that why not join a reality TV show?” Still, she remembered being initially taken aback when two of the cast members started fighting during a dinner scene.”
““Honestly I had hit such a low point in my life, with a mug shot in Palm Beach,” Mortimer confessed.”
“Mortimer has had her own unique arc, joining the cast in 2017 following a trespassing arrest in Palm Beach.”
“It gave me back my independence after my divorce,” she continued, saying her Bravo gig has allowed her to provide “financial and emotional stability” for her daughter.”
“I do walk my dog in my pajamas, I do make out with people on the street.”“The good thing, as Dorinda pointed out, we do get to support our charities in a big way now.”
“...problem I really haven t changed so I m still behaving badly...”
“You realize that you have this platform and this ability to affect people and they really think they know you Also No more walking around in pajamas Asked how she s changed over the seasons Morgan quipped That s the...”
““I was so used to people recognizing my husband and not me, and then all of a sudden…” Medley recalled, noting her transformation from political wife to TV star.”


"I'm still in touch with Sarah Paulson! "Provide medley."
"Cohen revealed that they had associated Medley with a number of celebrity admirers."
"I really think, I'm already very low, why don't I take part in the reality show? "Still, she remembers that when two actors started fighting at a dinner party, she was shocked at first."
"To be honest, I photographed a mug in Palm Beach, which was the bottom of my life," Mortimer admitted
"Mortimer has his own unique arc. He joined the cast after being arrested for breaking into palm beach in 2017."
"It made me independent after the divorce," she continued, adding that her performance provided her daughter with "financial and emotional stability."
"I do walk the dog in my pajamas. I do make out on the street." "Fortunately, as Dorinda pointed out, we can really support our philanthropy now."
“… I really haven't changed the problem, so my behavior is still terrible... "
"You realize that you have the platform and the ability to influence people, and they really think they know you don't walk around in your pajamas anymore. When asked how she changes with the seasons, Morgan joked that this is..."
"I was so used to being recognized by my husband instead of me, and all of a sudden She noticed that she had gone from a political wife to a TV star



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.22448979591836735
Correct number is  11
Total number is  49
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
